Vermont, session 2025-2026, H48.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 10 V.S.A. § 567 is amended to read:
§ 567. MOTOR VEHICLE POLLUTION
* * *
(b)(1) Except as permitted or authorized by law, no person shall fail to
maintain in good working order or remove, dismantle, or otherwise cause to be
inoperative any equipment or feature constituting an operational element of the
air pollution control system or mechanism of a motor vehicle and required by
rules pursuant to this chapter to be maintained in or on the vehicle. Any failure
VT LEG #379535 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.48
2025 Page 2 of 3
to maintain in good working order or removal, dismantling, or causing of
inoperability shall subject the owner or operator to suspension or cancellation
of the registration for the vehicle by the Department of Motor Vehicles. The
vehicle shall not thereafter be eligible for registration until all parts and
equipment constituting operational elements of the motor vehicle have been
restored, replaced, or repaired and are in good working order.
(2) No person shall retrofit a motor vehicle with any device or other
equipment that enhances the vehicle’s ability to emit soot, smoke, or
particulates. A person who violates this subdivision shall, in addition to the
penalty set forth in subdivision (1) of this subsection, be subject to a civil
penalty of not more than $500.00 for a first offense, and not less than $500.00
nor more than $1,000.00 for a second or subsequent offense.
* * *
Sec. 2. 23 V.S.A. § 1221 is amended to read:
§ 1221. CONDITION OF VEHICLE; EXCESSIVE EXHAUST EMISSIONS
(a) A motor vehicle, operated on any highway, shall be in good mechanical
condition and shall be properly equipped.
(b)(1) An individual shall not:
(A) operate a motor vehicle that:
(i) has any device or equipment installed that enhances the
vehicle’s ability to emit soot, smoke, or particulates; or
VT LEG #379535 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.48
2025 Page 3 of 3
(ii) has an exhaust system that has been modified to increase the
amount of soot, smoke, or particulates emitted by the vehicle; or
(B) purposefully release from, or cause to be released from, a motor
vehicle visible quantities of soot, smoke, or particulates into the air or onto the
roadway, other vehicles, or persons.
(2) A person who violates this subsection shall be subject to a civil
penalty of not more than $500.00 for a first offense, and not less than $500.00
nor more than $1,000.00 for a second or subsequent offense.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #379535 v.1